New York, session 2025-2026, A2587.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 19.18-c of the mental hygiene law is amended by 2 adding a new subdivision 6 to read as follows: 3 6. Services to be provided by a jail-based substance use disorder 4 treatment, peer led recovery support services, and transition services 5 program pursuant to subdivision two of this section shall be deemed 6 essential medical care services. 7 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03757-01-5